Utah statutes.
63H-2-201.   Creation of Utah Generated Renewable Energy Electricity Network
Authority.
(1)  There is created an independent state agency known as the "Utah Generated
Renewable Energy Electricity Network Authority."
(2)  Subject to Section 63H-2-203, the authority may:
(a)  sue and be sued;
(b)  enter into contracts generally;
(c) (i)  accept financial or other assistance from a public or private source
for the authority's activities, powers, and duties; and
(ii)  expend money received under Subsection (2)(c)(i) for a qualifying
transmission project;
(d) (i)  for the purpose of studying a qualifying transmission project, borrow
money or accept financial or other assistance from:
(A)  a public entity; or
(B)  any other source; and
(ii)  comply with a condition of a loan or assistance described in Subsection
(2)(d)(i);
(e)  in accordance with Part 4, Bonding, issue one or more bonds to finance a
qualifying transmission project;
(f)  hire one or more employees, including:
(i)  a contract employee; and
(ii)  legal counsel;
(g)  enter into a partnership agreement with a business entity related to a
qualifying transmission project;
(h)  enter into an agreement with a public entity related to a qualifying
transmission project;
(i)  if none of the authority's net earnings inure to the benefit of a private
entity, use money available to the authority:
(i)  for administrative, overhead, legal, or other operating expenses of the
authority; and
(ii)  to pay the principal and interest on an authority bond;
(j)  create one or more subsidiaries to engage in an activity that the
authority may engage in under this chapter;
(k)  transact other business related to a qualifying transmission project;
(l)  acquire, own, lease, or sell real property or personal property related
to a qualifying transmission project; or
(m)  exercise a power provided for in this chapter.
(3)  Unless expressly provided in this chapter, the state is not liable for an
obligation, expense, debt, or liability of the authority.
